Oklahoma, session 2025, SB315.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2802, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2802. As used in Section 2801 et seq. of this title:


1. “Accepted standards for mass appraisal practice” means those


standards for the collection and analysis of information about


taxable properties within a taxing jurisdiction permitting the


accurate estimate of fair cash value for similar properties in the


jurisdiction either without direct observation of such similar


properties or without direct sales price information for such


similar properties using a reliable statistical or other method to


estimate the values of such properties;

Req. No. 356 Page 1


2. “Additional homestead exemption” means the exemption


provided by Section 2890 of this title;


3. “Assessor” means the county assessor and, unless the context


clearly requires otherwise, deputy assessors and persons employed by


the county assessor in performance of duties imposed by law;


4. “Assess and value” means to establish the fair cash value


and taxable fair cash value of taxable real and personal property


pursuant to requirements of law;


5. “Assessed valuation” or “assessed value” means the


percentage of the fair cash value of personal property, or the


percentage of the taxable fair cash value of real property, pursuant


to the provisions of Sections 8 and 8B of Article X of the Oklahoma


Constitution, either of individual items of personal property,


parcels of real property or the aggregate total of such individual


taxable items or parcels within a jurisdiction;


6. “Assessment percentage” means the percentage applied to


personal property and real property pursuant to Section 8 of Article


X of the Oklahoma Constitution;


7. “Assessment ratio” means the relationship between assessed


value and taxable fair cash value for a county or for use categories


within a county expressed as a percentage determined in the annual


equalization ratio study;





Req. No. 356 Page 2


8. “Assessment roll” means a computerized or noncomputerized


record required by law to be kept by the county assessor and


containing information about property within a taxing jurisdiction;


9. “Assessment year” means the year beginning January 1 of each


calendar year and ending on December 31 preceding the following


January 1 assessment date;


10. “Circuit breaker” means the form of property tax relief


provided by Sections 2904 through 2911 of this title;


11. “Class of subjects” means a category of property


specifically designated pursuant to provisions of the Oklahoma


Constitution for purposes of ad valorem taxation;


12. “Code” means the Ad Valorem Tax Code, Section 2801 et seq.


of this title;


13. “Coefficient of dispersion” means a statistical measure of


assessment uniformity for a category of property or for all property


within a taxing jurisdiction;


14. “Confidence level” means a statistical procedure for


determining the degree of reliability for use in reporting the


assessment ratio for a taxing jurisdiction;


15. “Cost approach” means a method used to establish the fair


cash value of property involving an estimate of current construction


cost of improvements, subtracting accrued depreciation including any


loss in value that may be caused by physical deterioration,



Req. No. 356 Page 3


functional obsolescence, or economic obsolescence, and adding the


value of the land.


a. Physical deterioration is a cause of depreciation that


is a loss in value due to ordinary wear and tear and


the forces of nature.


b. Functional or internal obsolescence is the loss in


value of a property resulting from changes in tastes,


preferences, technical innovations, or market


standards.


c. Economic or external obsolescence is a cause of


depreciation that is a loss in value as a result of


impairment in utility and desirability caused by


factors outside the boundaries of the property or loss


of value in a property (relative to the cost of


replacing it with a property of equal utility) that


stems from factors external to the property;


16. “County board of equalization” means the board which, upon


hearing competent evidence, has the authority to correct and adjust


the assessment rolls in its respective county to conform to fair


cash value and such other responsibilities as prescribed in Section


2801 et seq. of this title;


17. “Equalization” means the process for making adjustments to


taxable property values within a county by analyzing the


relationships between assessed values and fair cash values in one or

Req. No. 356 Page 4


more use categories within the county or between counties by


analyzing the relationship between assessed value and fair cash


value in each county;


18. “Equalization ratio study” means the analysis of the


relationships between assessed values and fair cash values in the


manner provided by law;


19. “Fair cash value” or “market value” means the value or


price at which a willing buyer would purchase property and a willing


seller would sell property if both parties are knowledgeable about


the property and its uses and if neither party is under any undue


pressure to buy or sell and for real property shall mean the value


for the highest and best use for which such property was actually


used, or was previously classified for use, during the calendar year


next preceding the applicable January 1 assessment date;


20. “Homestead exemption” means the reduction in the taxable


value of a homestead as authorized by law;


21. “Income and expense approach” means a method to estimate


fair cash value of a property by determining the present value of


the projected income stream;


22. “List and assess” means the process by which taxable


property is discovered, its description recorded for purposes of ad


valorem taxation, and its fair cash value and taxable fair cash


value are established;



Req. No. 356 Page 5


23. “Mill” or “millage” means the rate of tax imposed upon


taxable value. One (1) mill equals One Dollar ($1.00) of tax for


each One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) of taxable value;


24. “Multiple regression analysis” means a statistical


technique for estimating unknown data on the basis of known and


available data;


25. “Parcel” means a contiguous area of land described in a


single description by a deed or other instrument or as one of a


number of lots on a plat or plan, separately owned and capable of


being separately conveyed;


26. “Sales comparison approach” means the collection,


verification, and screening of sales data, stratification of sales


information for purposes of comparison, and use of such information


to establish the fair cash value of taxable property;


27. “State Board of Equalization” means the Board responsible


for valuation of railroad, airline, and public service corporation


property and the adjustment and equalization of all property values


both centrally and locally assessed;


28. “Taxable value” means the percentage of the fair cash value


of personal property or the taxable fair cash value of real


property, less applicable exemptions, upon which an ad valorem tax


rate is levied pursuant to the provisions of Section 8 and Section


8B of Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution;



Req. No. 356 Page 6


29. “Taxable fair cash value” means the fair cash value of


locally assessed real property as capped pursuant to Section 8B of


Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution;


30. “Use category” means a subcategory of real property, that


is either agricultural use, residential use, or


commercial/industrial use but does not and shall not constitute a


class of subjects within the meaning of the Oklahoma Constitution


for purposes of ad valorem taxation;


31. “Use value” means the basis for establishing fair cash


value of real property pursuant to the requirement of Section 8 of


Article X of the Oklahoma Constitution; and


32. “Visual inspection program” means the program required in


order to gather data about real property from physical examination


of the property and improvements in order to establish the fair cash


values of properties so inspected at least once each four (4) years


and the fair cash values of similar properties on an annual basis.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2821, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2821. A. Each county assessor shall cause real


property to be physically inspected as part of the visual inspection


cycle and shall require such examination as will provide adequate


data from which to make accurate valuations.


B. The information gathered from the physical inspection shall


be relevant to the type of property involved, its use category, the

Req. No. 356 Page 7


valuation methodology to be used for the property, whether the


methodology consists of the cost approach, an income and expense


approach or sales comparison approach, and shall be complete enough


in order to establish the fair cash value of the property in


accordance with accepted standards for mass appraisal practice.


C. Information gathered during the physical inspection shall be


recorded using a standard method as prescribed by the Oklahoma Tax


Commission in computerized or noncomputerized form. The information


may include property ownership, location, size, use, use category, a


physical description of the land and improvements, or such other


information as may be required.


D. In order to conduct the visual inspections of real property


during the four-year cycle, each county assessor shall acquire and


maintain cadastral maps and a parcel identification system. The


standards for the cadastral maps and the parcel identification


system shall be uniform for each county of the state and shall be in


such form as developed by the Ad Valorem Task Force Division.


E. The county assessor shall maintain a comprehensive sales


file for each parcel of real property within the county containing


relevant property characteristics, sales price information,


adjustments to sales price for purposes of cash equivalency,


transaction terms, and such other information as may be required in


order to establish the fair cash value of taxable real property.



Req. No. 356 Page 8


Each county assessor shall ensure that the office is equipped


with adequate drafting facilities, tools, equipment, and supplies in


order to produce or update maps, sketches, or drawings necessary to


support the proper administration of the ad valorem tax and such


other tools or equipment as may be required to perform duties


imposed by law for the discovery and valuation of taxable property.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 68 O.S. 2021, Section 2823, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 2823. A. For each fiscal year, the cost of the


comprehensive program of visual inspections for real property and


the cost of physical inspections of personal property shall be paid


by appropriate warrants from those who receive the revenues of the


mill rates levied on the property of the county as prescribed by


this section. School districts are hereby authorized to pay such


costs from revenues accruing to their building funds. The county


assessor shall prepare a budget for the comprehensive program of


visual inspections for real property and the cost of physical


inspections of personal property and file such budget with the


county excise board or county budget board.


B. The county excise board or county budget board shall


apportion such cost among the various recipients of revenues from


the mill rates levied, including the county, all cities and towns,


all school districts, all sinking funds of such recipients, and all


jurisdictions specified in subsection D of this section, in the

Req. No. 356 Page 9


ratio which each recipient’s total tax collection authorized from


its mill rates levied for the preceding year bears to the total tax


collection authorized of all recipients from all their mill rates


levied for the preceding year. The cost shall include only those


expenses directly attributable to the visual inspection program and


those expenses directly attributable to physical inspections of


personal property and shall not include any expenses of the office


of the county assessor which, in the judgment of the county excise


board or county budget board, are expenses of county assessor’s


office which would exist in the absence of such program or in the


absence of physical on-site inspection of personal property.


Expenses that are attributable both to the visual inspection program


and physical on-site inspection of personal property, and which


would exist in the absence of such program or inspection, including,


but not limited to, salaries, employee benefits, office supplies,


and equipment, may be prorated; provided, no portion of the salary


of the county assessor shall be included in such costs.


C. Upon receipt of the billing statement provided for in


subsections D and E of this section by each such recipient, the mill


rates to be established by the board for each such recipient for the


current year shall include and be based upon such amounts and shall


constitute an appropriation of such amounts to the county assessor


for expenditure for the expenses of administering the visual


inspection program each year. In the case of a sinking fund of a

Req. No. 356 Page 10


recipient, if, after approving its budget, the governing body of a


recipient notifies the board in writing that there are no funds


appropriated to pay the amount of the billing statement for such


sinking fund, such notice shall constitute conclusive evidence of a


financial obligation of the recipient as it relates to such sinking


fund. The board may seek a judgment for the amount of such


obligation and court costs in the district court of the county in


which the board is located.


D. The county assessor shall render a statement to each of the


jurisdictions within the county which receive revenue from an ad


valorem mill rate. Such statement shall include the following


information:


1. The current fiscal year in which the charge has been


incorporated in the jurisdiction’s budget;


2. All jurisdictions receiving statements from the county


assessor, the mill rate for each in the previous year, and the


proportion of each to the combined mill rates of all jurisdictions


within the county for the previous year. The proportions specified


in this paragraph should equal a total of one hundred percent


(100%);


3. The charge for the entity receiving the statement as well as


the charge for each jurisdiction of the county based upon the


proportions specified in paragraph 2 of this subsection. The total


of all current year charges for all county jurisdictions should

Req. No. 356 Page 11


equal the total visual inspection program budget for the current


fiscal year;


4. The amount of the total budget for the office of the county


assessor and the percentage that visual inspection program expenses


are of such total budget; and


5. A copy of the County Budget Visual Inspection Account county


budget visual inspection account and a brief description of the


areas to be visually inspected for the current fiscal year,


consistent with the plan on file with the Oklahoma Tax Commission


pursuant to Section 2820 of this title.


E. In any county wherein any jurisdiction’s budget and mill


rates are not subject to review and approval by the county excise


board, the county assessor shall nevertheless include any such


jurisdiction in the calculations required under subsection A of this


section. The county assessor shall also render a billing statement


to any such jurisdiction showing the charge for the current fiscal


year due from the jurisdiction. Such billing statement shall also


show all the information specified in subsection D of this section.


Such billing statement shall clearly indicate that the charge


payable by the jurisdiction is due and payable by December 31 of the


current fiscal year.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-356 MSBB 12/31/2024 9:28:29 AM

Req. No. 356 Page 12